Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-527
Nonresident's operating privilege; suspension or revocation; conviction or forfeiture of bail; proof of financial responsibility for removal.

Whenever the department suspends or revokes a nonresident's operating privilege by reason of a conviction or forfeiture of bail, such privilege shall remain so suspended or revoked unless such person shall have previously given or shall immediately give and shall maintain for three years proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 27, p. 494.